Hawaii, session 2026, SB1537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that feral non-native animals pose a threat to the State's native species, including the Hawaiian monk seal, nene goose, and other native birds. Feral non-native animals may carry diseases, including toxoplasmosis, a disease caused by the parasite Toxoplasma gondii, which is the leading cause of Hawaiian monk seal mortality.  T. gondii reproduces in the digestive system of certain non-native animals, spreading into the environment via the feces of these animals.  Rainwater and runoff transport the eggs of T. gondii into the ocean through streams and gutters, infecting Hawaiian monk seals that consume contaminated water or prey. The disease is almost always lethal for Hawaiian monk seals as there is a lack of effective treatment options. The legislature further finds that there are large and growing populations of feral non-native animals throughout the State. Feeding feral non-native animals perpetuates population growth and ultimately increases the amount of T. gondii eggs spread into the environment.  For the protection and preservation of the State's native species, it is necessary to manage feral non-native animal populations. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit the feeding of feral non-native animals within one-half mile of the ocean or a stream and impose certain penalties. SECTION 2.  Chapter 183D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part V to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§183D-    Feeding of feral non-native animals; prohibited; penalty.  (a) No person shall harbor, feed, or in any way care for a feral non-native animal on state land within one-half mile of the ocean or a stream. (b)  Any person who violates subsection (a) shall be: (1)  For a first offense, issued a warning by the department; (2)  For a second offense, issued a citation and required to perform community service as directed by the department; provided that the department may recommend an order of community service that benefits the resource that was damaged; and (3)  For a third or subsequent offense, guilty of a misdemeanor. (c) Each county shall adopt or amend its ordinances to implement this section no later than January 1,     , as it relates to the prohibition of harboring, feeding, or in any way caring for a feral non-native animal on county land within one-half mile of the ocean or a stream. (d) The department shall submit a report to the legislature, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, detailing violations of this section." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________